Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.220

Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills—Fairness and bias review.

Before implementing the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills as provided under RCW 28A.150.315, the superintendent of public instruction and the department of children, youth, and families must assure that a fairness and bias review of the assessment process has been conducted, including providing an opportunity for input from the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee under RCW 28A.300.136 and from an additional diverse group of community representatives, parents, and educators to be convened by the superintendent and the secretary of the department.

[ 2018 c 58 s 28; 2011 c 340 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.